North Carolina, session 2025, HB100.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-278.3(g) reads as rewritten:
"(g) The following exceptions apply to the exclusive-use requirement of subsection (a) of
this section:
…
(4) Undeveloped land acquired by an agency listed in subsection (c) of this
section with contiguous land exempt under this section is exempt from
taxation for a period not to exceed five years if (i) it does not exceed two
hundred percent (200%) of the contiguous land owned by the agency currently
exempt under this section and (ii) the agency certifies that within five years of
acquiring the undeveloped land it will either begin to use the land wholly and
exclusively for religious purposes or begin to develop the land in a manner
which is intended to be wholly and exclusively used by the agency for
religious purposes upon completion. If the certification requirements are not
met, the land is subject to discovery pursuant to G.S. 105-312."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on
or after July 1, 2026.
*H100-v-1*